Maryland, session 2026, HB0564.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(f) (1) “Cemetery” means land used or to be used for interment.
(2) “Cemetery” includes a structure used or to be used for interment.
(g) “Cremation” means the disposition of a dead human body by means of
incineration.
(h) “Crematory” means a building, portion of a building, or structure that houses
the necessary appliances and facilities for cremation or alkaline hydrolysis.
(i) “Director” means the Director of the Office of Cemetery Oversight.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 547
(s) “Permit” means a permit issued by the Director to allow a partnership, limited
liability company, or corporation to operate a business through which a registrant may:
(1) engage in the operation of a cemetery or crematory; or
(2) provide burial goods.
[(t) (1) “Pet remains” means the body of a deceased animal that was kept as a
pet.
(2) “Pet remains” includes the body of a pet or a part of a pet’s body in any
state of decomposition or the body of a pet after having been cremated.]
[(u)] (T) (1) “Preneed goods” means burial goods that are sold before the
buyer’s death.
(2) “Preneed goods” does not include burial space.
[(v)] (U) “Provide burial goods” means a retail transaction:
(1) to erect, service, or inscribe burial memorials; or
(2) to sell burial goods.
[(w)] (V) “Reduction facility” means a building, portion of a building, or structure
that houses the necessary appliances, containers, and facilities for performing natural
organic reduction.
[(x)] (W) “Registered cemeterian” means an individual registered to operate a
cemetery as a sole proprietor or on behalf of a sole proprietor or of a permit holder.
[(y)] (X) “Registered crematory operator” means an individual registered to
operate a crematory as a sole proprietor or on behalf of a sole proprietor or permit holder.
[(z)] (Y) “Registered reduction operator” means an individual registered to
operate a reduction facility as a sole proprietor or on behalf of a sole proprietor or a permit
holder.
[(aa)] (Z) “Registered seller” means an individual registered to provide burial
goods as a sole proprietor or on behalf of a sole proprietor or of a permit holder.
[(bb)] (AA) “Registration” means a registration issued by the Director authorizing
an individual to operate a cemetery, to operate a crematory, to operate a reduction facility,
or to provide burial goods.
– 3 –

Ch. 547 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(cc)] (BB) “Responsible party” means a sole proprietor or the individual
designated by a partnership, limited liability company, or corporation to be responsible for
the operations of a cemetery, crematory, reduction facility, or burial goods business.
[(dd)] (CC) “Soil remains” means the soil produced at final disposition of a dead
human body at a reduction facility by completion of natural organic reduction.
SUBTITLE 7A. PET CREMATION AND BURIAL SERVICES.
5–7A–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “PET” MEANS A DOMESTICATED OR TAMED ANIMAL KEPT AS A
COMPANION OR FOR PLEASURE.
(C) “PET CREMAINS” MEANS THE BODY FRAGMENTS OF A PET AFTER
HAVING BEEN CREMATED.
(D) (1) “PET REMAINS” MEANS THE BODY OF A DECEASED ANIMAL THAT
WAS KEPT AS A PET.
(2) “PET REMAINS” INCLUDES THE BODY OF A PET OR A PART OF A
PET’S BODY IN ANY STATE OF DECOMPOSITION OR THE PET CREMAINS.
5–7A–02.
THIS SUBTITLE APPLIES ONLY TO A REGISTERED CEMETERIAN, REGISTERED
CEMETERY OPERATOR, OR PERMIT HOLDER THAT ENGAGES IN THE OPERATION OF
A CEMETERY, CREMATORY, OR BURIAL GOODS BUSINESS THAT SELLS OR OFFERS TO
SELL TO THE PUBLIC CREMATION SERVICES FOR PET REMAINS OR A BURIAL LOT OR
A BURIAL RIGHT IN A CEMETERY FOR PET REMAINS.
5–7A–03.
(A) EACH REGISTRANT OR PERMIT HOLDER SHALL DISTRIBUTE A WRITTEN
DESCRIPTION OF AVAILABLE PET CREMATION SERVICES TO THE FOLLOWING
PERSONS:
(1) EACH OWNER OF A DECEASED PET OR THE AGENT OF AN OWNER
OF A DECEASED PET WHO ARRANGES FOR PET CREMATION SERVICES;
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 547
(2) EACH VETERINARIAN, PET SHOP, FUNERAL DIRECTOR, OR OTHER
PERSON WHO REFERS PET OWNERS OR DELIVERS DECEASED PETS TO THE
REGISTRANT OR PERMIT HOLDER MORE THAN FIVE TIMES IN A CALENDAR YEAR;
(3) THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE; AND
(4) ON REQUEST, ANY OTHER PERSON.
(B) (1) THE DESCRIPTION OF PET CREMATION SERVICES REQUIRED
UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE A DETAILED AND CLEAR
EXPLANATION OF EACH PET CREMATION SERVICE OFFERED BY THE REGISTRANT OR
PERMIT HOLDER, INCLUDING THE FOLLOWING DESCRIPTIONS OF CREMATION
SERVICES, IF OFFERED:
(I) PRIVATE CREMATION MEANS THE CREMATION OF A SINGLE
PET IN A CLEAN, EMPTY CHAMBER, AFTER WHICH THE PET CREMAINS ARE
RETURNED EXCLUSIVELY TO THE OWNER OF THE PET;
(II) INDIVIDUAL–PARTITIONED CREMATION MEANS THE
CREMATION OF MULTIPLE PETS IN THE SAME CHAMBER USING PHYSICAL BARRIERS
OR DESIGNATED SPACES TO MAINTAIN SEPARATION, AFTER WHICH THE PET
CREMAINS ARE RETURNED TO EACH OWNER; AND
(III) COMMUNAL CREMATION MEANS THE CREMATION OF
MULTIPLE PETS SIMULTANEOUSLY IN A SINGLE CHAMBER WITHOUT SEPARATION
AND WITHOUT THE RETURN OF PET CREMAINS TO AN OWNER.
(2) IN THE DESCRIPTION OF PET CREMATION SERVICES REQUIRED
UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, A REGISTRANT OR PERMIT HOLDER MAY
NOT:
(I) FAIL TO INCLUDE A COMPLETE AND ACCURATE
EXPLANATION OF EACH PET CREMATION SERVICE;
(II) OMIT A REQUIRED DISCLOSURE UNDER THIS SECTION; OR
(III) INCLUDE TEXT, ILLUSTRATIONS, A LAYOUT, OR
FORMATTING THAT CAUSES CONFUSION ABOUT THE NATURE OF THE PET
CREMATION SERVICE OR OBSTRUCTS ACCURATE DISCLOSURE.
(3) EACH REGISTRANT OR PERMIT HOLDER SHALL MAKE WRITTEN
COPIES OF THE DESCRIPTION OF PET CREMATION SERVICES UNDER SUBSECTION
(A) OF THIS SECTION:
– 5 –

Ch. 547 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) AVAILABLE IN QUANTITIES SUFFICIENT TO ALLOW FOR THE
DISTRIBUTION TO PET OWNERS WHO MAY BE REFERRED TO OR SERVED BY THE
REGISTRANT OR PERMIT HOLDER; AND
(II) AVAILABLE AT NO COST.
(C) A VETERINARIAN, PET SHOP, REGISTRANT, PERMIT HOLDER, OR ANY
OTHER PERSON WHO REFERS PET OWNERS OR ACCEPTS DECEASED PETS FOR
CREMATION MORE THAN FIVE TIMES IN A CALENDAR YEAR SHALL PROVIDE A COPY
OF THE DESCRIPTION OF PET CREMATION SERVICES DESCRIBED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION TO THE PET OWNER AT THE TIME OF REFERRAL
OR ACCEPTANCE OF THE DECEASED PET.
5–7A–04.
(A) IF PET CREMATION SERVICES PROVIDED BY A REGISTRANT OR PERMIT
HOLDER INCLUDE THE RETURN OF PET CREMAINS, THE REGISTRANT OR PERMIT
HOLDER SHALL PROVIDE A WRITTEN CERTIFICATE WITH THE RETURNED PET
CREMAINS THAT INCLUDES:
(1) THE DATE THE CREMATION WAS COMPLETED;
(2) A STATEMENT THAT, TO THE BEST OF THE REGISTRANT’S OR
PERMIT HOLDER’S KNOWLEDGE AND BELIEF, THE CREMATION AND RELATED
SERVICES WERE PERFORMED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE REGISTRANT’S OR PERMIT
HOLDER’S WRITTEN DESCRIPTION OF SERVICES UNLESS OTHERWISE INDICATED ON
THE CERTIFICATE;
(3) A STATEMENT THAT THE CREMATION WAS CONDUCTED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH PREVAILING INDUSTRY STANDARDS AND BEST PRACTICES AND
IN COMPLIANCE WITH APPLICABLE FEDERAL AND STATE LAWS; AND
(4) THE FOLLOWING STATEMENT: “THE POSTED DISCLOSURE OF PET
CREMATION AND BURIAL SERVICES RIGHTS AND RESPONSIBILITIES IS A SUMMARY
OF MARYLAND LAW. THE FULL PROVISIONS OF THE LAW ARE SET FORTH IN THE PET
CREMATION AND BURIAL SERVICES CONSUMER PROTECTION ACT IN TITLE 5,
SUBTITLE 7A OF THE BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE OF THE MARYLAND
ANNOTATED CODE.”.
(B) A VETERINARIAN, PET SHOP, OR OTHER PERSON RESPONSIBLE FOR
RETURNING PET CREMAINS TO A PET OWNER SHALL PROVIDE TO THE PET OWNER:
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 547
(1) A COPY OF THE CERTIFICATE PROVIDED BY THE REGISTRANT OR
PERMIT HOLDER UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) AN ADDITIONAL CERTIFICATE THAT STATES, TO THE BEST OF THE
PERSON’S KNOWLEDGE AND BELIEF, AND EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE INDICATED ON
THE CERTIFICATE, THE RETURNED PET CREMAINS:
(I) ARE THOSE OF THE PET OWNER’S DECEASED PET; AND
(II) HAVE BEEN RETURNED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
REGISTRANT’S OR PERMIT HOLDER’S REPRESENTATIONS TO THE PET OWNER.
(C) A VETERINARIAN, PET SHOP, OR OTHER PERSON RESPONSIBLE FOR
RETURNING PET CREMAINS TO A PET OWNER:
(1) MAY RELY IN GOOD FAITH ON THE CERTIFICATE PROVIDED AND
REPRESENTATIONS MADE BY A REGISTRANT OR PERMIT HOLDER PROVIDING PET
CREMATION SERVICES IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SECTION; AND
(2) IS NOT REQUIRED TO OBSERVE THE CREMATION PROCESS.
5–7A–05.
(A) EACH REGISTRANT OR PERMIT HOLDER PROVIDING PET CREMATION
SERVICES SHALL POST A COPY OF THIS SUBTITLE AND A WRITTEN DESCRIPTION OF
THE PET CREMATION SERVICES BEING OFFERED IN A CONSPICUOUS PLACE IN THE
PLACE OF BUSINESS.
(B) EACH REGISTRANT OR PERMIT HOLDER THAT PROVIDES PET
CREMATION SERVICES SHALL ENSURE THAT A HOLDING FACILITY USED TO RETAIN
PET REMAINS BEFORE CREMATION:
(1) PROTECTS THE HEALTH OF ALL INDIVIDUALS RESPONSIBLE FOR
HANDLING PET REMAINS;
(2) PRESERVES THE DIGNITY OF THE PET REMAINS; AND
(3) COMPLIES WITH APPLICABLE FEDERAL AND STATE LAWS.
– 7 –

Ch. 547 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(C) (1) EACH REGISTRANT OR PERMIT HOLDER THAT PROVIDES PET
CREMATION SERVICES SHALL MAINTAIN COMPLETE AND ACCURATE RECORDS FOR
EACH PET CREMATION COMPLETED.
(2) EACH REGISTRANT AND PERMIT HOLDER SHALL RETAIN THE
FOLLOWING RECORDS FOR A PERIOD OF AT LEAST 5 YEARS:
(I) EACH AUTHORIZATION FOR PET CREMATION SIGNED BY
THE PET OWNER OR PET OWNER’S AGENT;
(II) EACH IDENTIFICATION RECORD, INCLUDING TAGS, LABELS,
OR TRACKING DOCUMENTATION USED TO IDENTIFY PET CREMAINS; AND
(III) A LOGBOOK FOR EACH PET CREMATION COMPLETED THAT
SPECIFIES:
1. THE DATE OF CREMATION;
2. THE METHOD OF CREMATION, AND
3. THE NAME OF THE INDIVIDUAL WHO PERFORMED THE
CREMATION.
(3) EACH REGISTRANT OR PERMIT HOLDER SHALL ESTABLISH AND
MAINTAIN REASONABLE PROCEDURES TO ENSURE THE CONFIDENTIALITY AND
SECURITY OF ALL RECORDS, INCLUDING PERSONALLY IDENTIFYING INFORMATION
RELATED TO A PET OWNER OR CREMATED PET.
[5–804.] 5–7A–06.
(a) In this section, “perpetual care” has the meaning stated in § 5–601 of this title.
(b) A registered cemeterian, registered crematory operator, or permit holder that
engages in the operation of a cemetery, crematory, or burial goods business who sells or
offers to sell to the public cremation services, a burial lot, or a burial right in a cemetery
for pet remains as to which perpetual care is stated or implied owes a duty of perpetual
care for the cemetery in which the pet remains are interred.
(c) The Director shall adopt regulations in accordance with § 5–204(a) of this title
to enforce the requirements of this section.
5–7A–07.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 547
(A) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SUBTITLE IS GUILTY OF A
MISDEMEANOR AND, ON CONVICTION, IS SUBJECT TO:
(1) FOR A FIRST VIOLATION, A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 OR
IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 1 YEAR OR BOTH;
(2) FOR A SECOND VIOLATION, A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $10,000 OR
IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 2 YEARS OR BOTH; AND
(3) FOR A THIRD OR SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION, A FINE NOT
EXCEEDING $15,000 OR IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 3 YEARS OR BOTH.
(B) (1) IF THE DIRECTOR FINDS THAT A PERSON HAS VIOLATED THIS
SUBTITLE OR A REGULATION ADOPTED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, THE DIRECTOR MAY
REFER THE MATTER TO:
(I) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL FOR CIVIL ENFORCEMENT; OR
(II) THE APPROPRIATE STATE’S ATTORNEY FOR CRIMINAL
PROSECUTION.
(2) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY SUE FOR AND A COURT MAY
GRANT:
(I) INJUNCTIVE OR OTHER EQUITABLE RELIEF;
(II) IMPOSITION OF A CIVIL PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING $5,000;
OR
(III) BOTH.
5–7A–08.
THIS SUBTITLE AND TITLE 7, SUBTITLE 4B OF THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS
ARTICLE MAY BE CITED AS THE “MARYLAND MARYLAND PET CREMATION AND
BURIAL SERVICES CONSUMER PROTECTION ACT” ACT.
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
– 9 –

Ch. 547 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlvii) Title 14, Subtitle 50 of this article; [or]
(xlviii) Section 13–411.1(c)(2) of the Transportation Article; or
(XLIX) TITLE 5, SUBTITLE 7A OF THE BUSINESS
REGULATION ARTICLE; OR
(XLX) TITLE 7, SUBTITLE 4B OF THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS
ARTICLE; OR
Article – Health Occupations
7–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Board” means the State Board of Morticians and Funeral Directors.
(m) (1) “License” means, unless the context requires otherwise, a license issued
by the Board.
(2) “License” includes, unless otherwise indicated:
(i) A mortician license;
(ii) An apprentice license;
(iii) A funeral director license;
(iv) A surviving spouse license;
(v) A corporation license;
(vi) A funeral establishment license; and
(vii) A courtesy card.
(r) “Licensee” means an individual or entity licensed by the Board to practice
mortuary science to the extent determined by the Board.
SUBTITLE 4B. PET CREMATION.
7–4B–01.
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 547
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “PET” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 5–7A–01 OF THE BUSINESS
REGULATION ARTICLE.
(C) “PET CREMAINS” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 5–7A–01 OF THE
BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE.
(D) “PET REMAINS” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 5–7A–01 OF THE
BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE.
7–4B–02.
THIS SUBTITLE APPLIES ONLY TO A LICENSEE THAT ENGAGES IN THE
OPERATION OF A CREMATORY THAT SELLS OR OFFERS TO SELL TO THE PUBLIC
CREMATION SERVICES FOR PET REMAINS.
7–4B–03.
(A) EACH LICENSEE SHALL DISTRIBUTE A WRITTEN DESCRIPTION OF
AVAILABLE PET CREMATION SERVICES TO THE FOLLOWING PERSONS:
(1) EACH OWNER OF A DECEASED PET OR THE AGENT OF AN OWNER
OF A DECEASED PET WHO ARRANGES FOR PET CREMATION SERVICES;
(2) EACH VETERINARIAN, PET SHOP, FUNERAL DIRECTOR, OR OTHER
PERSON WHO REFERS PET OWNERS OR DELIVERS DECEASED PETS TO THE LICENSEE
MORE THAN 5 TIMES IN A CALENDAR YEAR;
(3) THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE; AND
(4) ON REQUEST, ANY OTHER PERSON.
(B) (1) THE DESCRIPTION OF PET CREMATION SERVICES REQUIRED
UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE A DETAILED AND CLEAR
EXPLANATION OF EACH PET CREMATION SERVICE OFFERED BY THE LICENSEE,
INCLUDING THE FOLLOWING DESCRIPTIONS OF CREMATION SERVICES, IF OFFERED:
(I) PRIVATE CREMATION MEANS THE CREMATION OF A SINGLE
PET IN A CLEAN, EMPTY CHAMBER, AFTER WHICH THE PET CREMAINS ARE
RETURNED EXCLUSIVELY TO THE OWNER OF THE PET;
– 11 –

Ch. 547 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) INDIVIDUAL–PARTITIONED CREMATION MEANS THE
CREMATION OF MULTIPLE PETS IN THE SAME CHAMBER USING PHYSICAL BARRIERS
OR DESIGNATED SPACES TO MAINTAIN SEPARATION, AFTER WHICH THE PET
CREMAINS ARE RETURNED TO EACH OWNER; AND
(III) COMMUNAL CREMATION MEANS THE CREMATION OF
MULTIPLE PETS SIMULTANEOUSLY IN A SINGLE CHAMBER WITHOUT SEPARATION
AND WITHOUT THE RETURN OF PET CREMAINS TO AN OWNER.
(2) IN THE DESCRIPTION OF PET CREMATION SERVICES REQUIRED
UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, A LICENSEE MAY NOT:
(I) FAIL TO INCLUDE A COMPLETE AND ACCURATE
EXPLANATION OF EACH PET CREMATION SERVICE;
(II) OMIT A REQUIRED DISCLOSURE UNDER THIS SECTION; OR
(III) INCLUDE TEXT, ILLUSTRATIONS, A LAYOUT, OR
FORMATTING THAT CAUSES CONFUSION ABOUT THE NATURE OF THE PET
CREMATION SERVICE OR OBSTRUCTS ACCURATE DISCLOSURE.
(3) EACH LICENSEE SHALL MAKE WRITTEN COPIES OF THE
DESCRIPTION OF PET CREMATION SERVICES UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION:
(I) AVAILABLE IN QUANTITIES SUFFICIENT TO ALLOW FOR THE
DISTRIBUTION TO PET OWNERS WHO MAY BE REFERRED TO OR SERVED BY THE
LICENSEE; AND
(II) AVAILABLE AT NO COST.
(C) A VETERINARIAN, PET SHOP, REGISTRANT, PERMIT HOLDER, LICENSEE,
OR ANY OTHER PERSON WHO REFERS PET OWNERS OR ACCEPTS DECEASED PETS
FOR CREMATION MORE THAN 5 TIMES IN A CALENDAR YEAR SHALL PROVIDE A COPY
OF THE DESCRIPTION OF PET CREMATION SERVICES DESCRIBED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION TO THE PET OWNER AT THE TIME OF REFERRAL
OR ACCEPTANCE OF THE DECEASED PET.
7–4B–04.
(A) IF PET CREMATION SERVICES PROVIDED BY A LICENSEE INCLUDE THE
RETURN OF PET CREMAINS, THE LICENSEE SHALL PROVIDE A WRITTEN
CERTIFICATE WITH THE RETURNED PET CREMAINS THAT INCLUDES:
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 547
(1) THE DATE THE CREMATION WAS COMPLETED;
(2) A STATEMENT THAT, TO THE BEST OF THE LICENSEE’S
KNOWLEDGE AND BELIEF, THE CREMATION AND RELATED SERVICES WERE
PERFORMED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LICENSEE’S WRITTEN DESCRIPTION OF
SERVICES UNLESS OTHERWISE INDICATED ON THE CERTIFICATE;
(3) A STATEMENT THAT THE CREMATION WAS CONDUCTED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH PREVAILING INDUSTRY STANDARDS AND BEST PRACTICES AND
IN COMPLIANCE WITH APPLICABLE FEDERAL AND STATE LAWS; AND
(4) THE FOLLOWING STATEMENT: “THE POSTED DISCLOSURE OF PET
CREMATION RIGHTS AND RESPONSIBILITIES IS A SUMMARY OF MARYLAND LAW.
THE FULL PROVISIONS OF THE LAW ARE SET FORTH IN THE PET CREMATION
CONSUMER PROTECTION ACT IN TITLE 7, SUBTITLE 4B OF THE HEALTH
OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE OF THE MARYLAND ANNOTATED CODE.”.
(B) A VETERINARIAN, PET SHOP, OR OTHER PERSON RESPONSIBLE FOR
RETURNING PET CREMAINS TO A PET OWNER SHALL PROVIDE TO THE PET OWNER:
(1) A COPY OF THE CERTIFICATE PROVIDED BY THE LICENSEE UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) AN ADDITIONAL CERTIFICATE THAT STATES, TO THE BEST OF THE
PERSON’S KNOWLEDGE AND BELIEF, AND EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE INDICATED ON
THE CERTIFICATE, THE RETURNED PET CREMAINS:
(I) ARE THOSE OF THE PET OWNER’S DECEASED PET; AND
(II) HAVE BEEN RETURNED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
LICENSEE’S REPRESENTATIONS TO THE PET OWNER.
(C) A VETERINARIAN, PET SHOP, OR ANY OTHER PERSON RESPONSIBLE FOR
RETURNING PET CREMAINS TO A PET OWNER:
(1) MAY RELY IN GOOD FAITH ON THE CERTIFICATE PROVIDED AND
REPRESENTATIONS MADE BY A LICENSEE PROVIDING PET CREMATION SERVICES IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) IS NOT REQUIRED TO OBSERVE THE CREMATION PROCESS.
7–4B–05.
– 13 –

Ch. 547 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(A) EACH LICENSEE PROVIDING PET CREMATION SERVICES SHALL POST A
COPY OF THIS SUBTITLE AND A WRITTEN DESCRIPTION OF THE PET CREMATION
SERVICES BEING OFFERED IN A CONSPICUOUS PLACE IN THE PLACE OF BUSINESS.
(B) EACH LICENSEE THAT PROVIDES PET CREMATION SERVICES SHALL
ENSURE THAT A HOLDING FACILITY USED TO RETAIN PET REMAINS BEFORE
CREMATION:
(1) PROTECTS THE HEALTH OF ALL INDIVIDUALS RESPONSIBLE FOR
HANDLING PET REMAINS;
(2) PRESERVES THE DIGNITY OF THE PET REMAINS; AND
(3) COMPLIES WITH APPLICABLE FEDERAL AND STATE LAWS.
(C) (1) EACH LICENSEE THAT PROVIDES PET CREMATION SERVICES
SHALL MAINTAIN COMPLETE AND ACCURATE RECORDS FOR EACH PET CREMATION
COMPLETED.
(2) EACH LICENSEE SHALL RETAIN THE FOLLOWING RECORDS FOR A
PERIOD OF AT LEAST 5 YEARS:
(I) EACH AUTHORIZATION FOR PET CREMATION SIGNED BY
THE PET OWNER OR PET OWNER’S AGENT;
(II) EACH IDENTIFICATION RECORD, INCLUDING TAGS, LABELS,
OR TRACKING DOCUMENTATION USED TO IDENTIFY PET CREMAINS; AND
(III) A LOGBOOK FOR EACH PET CREMATION COMPLETED THAT
SPECIFIES:
1. THE DATE OF CREMATION;
2. THE METHOD OF CREMATION; AND
3. THE NAME OF THE INDIVIDUAL WHO PERFORMED THE
CREMATION.
(3) EACH LICENSEE SHALL ESTABLISH AND MAINTAIN REASONABLE
PROCEDURES TO ENSURE THE CONFIDENTIALITY AND SECURITY OF ALL RECORDS,
INCLUDING PERSONALLY IDENTIFYING INFORMATION RELATED TO A PET OWNER
OR CREMATED PET.
7–4B–06.
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 547
(A) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SUBTITLE IS GUILTY OF A
MISDEMEANOR AND, ON CONVICTION, IS SUBJECT TO:
(1) FOR A FIRST VIOLATION, A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 OR
IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 1 YEAR OR BOTH;
(2) FOR A SECOND VIOLATION, A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $10,000 OR
IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 2 YEARS OR BOTH; AND
(3) FOR A THIRD OR SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION, A FINE NOT
EXCEEDING $15,000 OR IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 3 YEARS OR BOTH.
(B) (1) IF THE BOARD FINDS THAT A PERSON HAS VIOLATED THIS
SUBTITLE OR A REGULATION ADOPTED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, THE BOARD MAY
REFER THE MATTER TO:
(I) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL FOR CIVIL ENFORCEMENT; OR
(II) THE APPROPRIATE STATE’S ATTORNEY FOR CRIMINAL
PROSECUTION.
(2) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY SUE FOR AND A COURT MAY
GRANT:
(I) INJUNCTIVE OR OTHER EQUITABLE RELIEF;
(II) IMPOSITION OF A CIVIL PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING $5,000;
OR
(III) BOTH.
7–4B–07.
THIS SUBTITLE AND TITLE 5, SUBTITLE 7A OF THE BUSINESS REGULATION
ARTICLE MAY BE CITED AS THE MARYLAND PET CREMATION CONSUMER
PROTECTION ACT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
– 15 –

Ch. 547 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlvii) Title 14, Subtitle 50 of this article; [or]
(xlviii) Section 13–411.1(c)(2) of the Transportation Article; or
(XLIX) TITLE 7, SUBTITLE 4B OF THE HEALTH
OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE; OR
Article – Health Occupations
7–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Board” means the State Board of Morticians and Funeral Directors.
(m) (1) “License” means, unless the context requires otherwise, a license issued
by the Board.
(2) “License” includes, unless otherwise indicated:
(i) A mortician license;
(ii) An apprentice license;
(iii) A funeral director license;
(iv) A surviving spouse license;
(v) A corporation license;
(vi) A funeral establishment license; and
(vii) A courtesy card.
(r) “Licensee” means an individual or entity licensed by the Board to practice
mortuary science to the extent determined by the Board.
SUBTITLE 4B. PET CREMATION.
7–4B–01.
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 547
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “PET” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 5–7A–01 OF THE BUSINESS
REGULATION ARTICLE MEANS A DOMESTICATED OR TAMED ANIMAL KEPT AS A
COMPANION OR FOR PLEASURE.
(C) “PET CREMAINS” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 5–7A–01 OF THE
BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE MEANS THE BODY FRAGMENTS OF A PET AFTER
HAVING BEEN CREMATED.
(D) “PET REMAINS” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 5–101 OF THE
BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE.
7–4B–02.
THIS SUBTITLE APPLIES ONLY TO A LICENSEE THAT ENGAGES IN THE
OPERATION OF A CREMATORY THAT SELLS OR OFFERS TO SELL TO THE PUBLIC
CREMATION SERVICES FOR PET REMAINS.
7–4B–03.
(A) EACH LICENSEE SHALL DISTRIBUTE A WRITTEN DESCRIPTION OF
AVAILABLE PET CREMATION SERVICES TO THE FOLLOWING PERSONS:
(1) EACH OWNER OF A DECEASED PET OR THE AGENT OF AN OWNER
OF A DECEASED PET WHO ARRANGES FOR PET CREMATION SERVICES;
(2) EACH VETERINARIAN, PET SHOP, FUNERAL DIRECTOR, OR OTHER
PERSON WHO REFERS PET OWNERS OR DELIVERS DECEASED PETS TO THE LICENSEE
MORE THAN 5 TIMES IN A CALENDAR YEAR;
(3) THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE; AND
(4) ON REQUEST, ANY OTHER PERSON.
(B) (1) THE DESCRIPTION OF PET CREMATION SERVICES REQUIRED
UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE A DETAILED AND CLEAR
EXPLANATION OF EACH PET CREMATION SERVICE OFFERED BY THE LICENSEE,
INCLUDING THE FOLLOWING DESCRIPTIONS OF CREMATION SERVICES, IF OFFERED:
(I) PRIVATE CREMATION MEANS THE CREMATION OF A SINGLE
PET IN A CLEAN, EMPTY CHAMBER, AFTER WHICH THE PET CREMAINS ARE
RETURNED EXCLUSIVELY TO THE OWNER OF THE PET;
– 17 –

Ch. 547 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) INDIVIDUAL–PARTITIONED CREMATION MEANS THE
CREMATION OF MULTIPLE PETS IN THE SAME CHAMBER USING PHYSICAL BARRIERS
OR DESIGNATED SPACES TO MAINTAIN SEPARATION, AFTER WHICH THE PET
CREMAINS ARE RETURNED TO EACH OWNER; AND
(III) COMMUNAL CREMATION MEANS THE CREMATION OF
MULTIPLE PETS SIMULTANEOUSLY IN A SINGLE CHAMBER WITHOUT SEPARATION
AND WITHOUT THE RETURN OF PET CREMAINS TO AN OWNER.
(2) IN THE DESCRIPTION OF PET CREMATION SERVICES REQUIRED
UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, A LICENSEE MAY NOT:
(I) FAIL TO INCLUDE A COMPLETE AND ACCURATE
EXPLANATION OF EACH PET CREMATION SERVICE;
(II) OMIT A REQUIRED DISCLOSURE UNDER THIS SECTION; OR
(III) INCLUDE TEXT, ILLUSTRATIONS, A LAYOUT, OR
FORMATTING THAT CAUSES CONFUSION ABOUT THE NATURE OF THE PET
CREMATION SERVICE OR OBSTRUCTS ACCURATE DISCLOSURE.
(3) EACH LICENSEE SHALL MAKE WRITTEN COPIES OF THE
DESCRIPTION OF PET CREMATION SERVICES UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION:
(I) AVAILABLE IN QUANTITIES SUFFICIENT TO ALLOW FOR THE
DISTRIBUTION TO PET OWNERS WHO MAY BE REFERRED TO OR SERVED BY THE
LICENSEE; AND
(II) AVAILABLE AT NO COST.
(C) A VETERINARIAN, PET SHOP, REGISTRANT, PERMIT HOLDER, LICENSEE,
OR ANY OTHER PERSON WHO REFERS PET OWNERS OR ACCEPTS DECEASED PETS
FOR CREMATION MORE THAN 5 TIMES IN A CALENDAR YEAR SHALL PROVIDE A COPY
OF THE DESCRIPTION OF PET CREMATION SERVICES DESCRIBED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION TO THE PET OWNER AT THE TIME OF REFERRAL
OR ACCEPTANCE OF THE DECEASED PET.
7–4B–04.
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 547
(A) IF PET CREMATION SERVICES PROVIDED BY A LICENSEE INCLUDE THE
RETURN OF PET CREMAINS, THE LICENSEE SHALL PROVIDE A WRITTEN
CERTIFICATE WITH THE RETURNED PET CREMAINS THAT INCLUDES:
(1) THE DATE THE CREMATION WAS COMPLETED;
(2) A STATEMENT THAT, TO THE BEST OF THE LICENSEE’S
KNOWLEDGE AND BELIEF, THE CREMATION AND RELATED SERVICES WERE
PERFORMED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LICENSEE’S WRITTEN DESCRIPTION OF
SERVICES UNLESS OTHERWISE INDICATED ON THE CERTIFICATE;
(3) A STATEMENT THAT THE CREMATION WAS CONDUCTED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH PREVAILING INDUSTRY STANDARDS AND BEST PRACTICES AND
IN COMPLIANCE WITH APPLICABLE FEDERAL AND STATE LAWS; AND
(4) THE FOLLOWING STATEMENT: “THE POSTED DISCLOSURE OF PET
CREMATION RIGHTS AND RESPONSIBILITIES IS A SUMMARY OF MARYLAND LAW.
THE FULL PROVISIONS OF THE LAW ARE SET FORTH IN THE PET CREMATION
CONSUMER PROTECTION ACT IN TITLE 7, SUBTITLE 4B OF THE HEALTH
OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE OF THE MARYLAND ANNOTATED CODE.”.
(B) A VETERINARIAN, PET SHOP, OR OTHER PERSON RESPONSIBLE FOR
RETURNING PET CREMAINS TO A PET OWNER SHALL PROVIDE TO THE PET OWNER:
(1) A COPY OF THE CERTIFICATE PROVIDED BY THE LICENSEE UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) AN ADDITIONAL CERTIFICATE THAT STATES, TO THE BEST OF THE
PERSON’S KNOWLEDGE AND BELIEF, AND EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE INDICATED ON
THE CERTIFICATE, THE RETURNED PET CREMAINS:
(I) ARE THOSE OF THE PET OWNER’S DECEASED PET; AND
(II) HAVE BEEN RETURNED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
LICENSEE’S REPRESENTATIONS TO THE PET OWNER.
(C) A VETERINARIAN, PET SHOP, OR ANY OTHER PERSON RESPONSIBLE FOR
RETURNING PET CREMAINS TO A PET OWNER:
(1) MAY RELY IN GOOD FAITH ON THE CERTIFICATE PROVIDED AND
REPRESENTATIONS MADE BY A LICENSEE PROVIDING PET CREMATION SERVICES IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) IS NOT REQUIRED TO OBSERVE THE CREMATION PROCESS.
– 19 –

Ch. 547 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
7–4B–05.
(A) EACH LICENSEE PROVIDING PET CREMATION SERVICES SHALL POST A
COPY OF THIS SUBTITLE AND A WRITTEN DESCRIPTION OF THE PET CREMATION
SERVICES BEING OFFERED IN A CONSPICUOUS PLACE IN THE PLACE OF BUSINESS.
(B) EACH LICENSEE THAT PROVIDES PET CREMATION SERVICES SHALL
ENSURE THAT A HOLDING FACILITY USED TO RETAIN PET REMAINS BEFORE
CREMATION:
(1) PROTECTS THE HEALTH OF ALL INDIVIDUALS RESPONSIBLE FOR
HANDLING PET REMAINS;
(2) PRESERVES THE DIGNITY OF THE PET REMAINS; AND
(3) COMPLIES WITH APPLICABLE FEDERAL AND STATE LAWS.
(C) (1) EACH LICENSEE THAT PROVIDES PET CREMATION SERVICES
SHALL MAINTAIN COMPLETE AND ACCURATE RECORDS FOR EACH PET CREMATION
COMPLETED.
(2) EACH LICENSEE SHALL RETAIN THE FOLLOWING RECORDS FOR A
PERIOD OF AT LEAST 5 YEARS:
(I) EACH AUTHORIZATION FOR PET CREMATION SIGNED BY
THE PET OWNER OR PET OWNER’S AGENT;
(II) EACH IDENTIFICATION RECORD, INCLUDING TAGS, LABELS,
OR TRACKING DOCUMENTATION USED TO IDENTIFY PET CREMAINS; AND
(III) A LOGBOOK FOR EACH PET CREMATION COMPLETED THAT
SPECIFIES:
1. THE DATE OF CREMATION;
2. THE METHOD OF CREMATION; AND
3. THE NAME OF THE INDIVIDUAL WHO PERFORMED THE
CREMATION.
(3) EACH LICENSEE SHALL ESTABLISH AND MAINTAIN REASONABLE
PROCEDURES TO ENSURE THE CONFIDENTIALITY AND SECURITY OF ALL RECORDS,
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 547
INCLUDING PERSONALLY IDENTIFYING INFORMATION RELATED TO A PET OWNER
OR CREMATED PET.
7–4B–06.
(A) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SUBTITLE IS GUILTY OF A
MISDEMEANOR AND, ON CONVICTION, IS SUBJECT TO:
(1) FOR A FIRST VIOLATION, A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 OR
IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 1 YEAR OR BOTH;
(2) FOR A SECOND VIOLATION, A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $10,000 OR
IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 2 YEARS OR BOTH; AND
(3) FOR A THIRD OR SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION, A FINE NOT
EXCEEDING $15,000 OR IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 3 YEARS OR BOTH.
(B) (1) IF THE BOARD FINDS THAT A PERSON HAS VIOLATED THIS
SUBTITLE OR A REGULATION ADOPTED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, THE BOARD MAY
REFER THE MATTER TO:
(I) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL FOR CIVIL ENFORCEMENT; OR
(II) THE APPROPRIATE STATE’S ATTORNEY FOR CRIMINAL
PROSECUTION.
(2) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY SUE FOR AND A COURT MAY
GRANT:
(I) INJUNCTIVE OR OTHER EQUITABLE RELIEF;
(II) IMPOSITION OF A CIVIL PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING $5,000;
OR
(III) BOTH.
7–4B–07.
THIS SUBTITLE MAY BE CITED AS THE MARYLAND PET CREMATION
CONSUMER PROTECTION ACT.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall
take effect October 1, 2026, contingent on the taking effect of Chapter 187 or 188 of 2026.
– 21 –

Ch. 547 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
If Section 2 of this Act takes effect, Section 1 of this Act, with no further action required by
the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 3 of this
Act, this Act shall take effect October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 22 –